Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 71, article 1, section 14, subdivision 54, is amended to read: Subd. 54. CornerHouse 2,750,000 For a grant to CornerHouse to acquire property for a new facility in Hennepin County.new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642, the appropriation for this project is available until December 31, 2029.new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end